Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.520

Disciplinary action.

(1) A violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it is grounds for disciplinary action.

(2) The procedures for any such action shall correspond to those applicable for disciplinary action for employee misconduct generally; for those state officers and state employees not specifically exempted in chapter 41.06 RCW, the rules set forth in chapter 41.06 RCW shall apply. Any action against the state officer or state employee shall be subject to judicial review to the extent provided by law for disciplinary action for misconduct of state officers and state employees of the same category and grade.

[ 1994 c 154 s 222; 1969 ex.s. c 234 s 26. Formerly RCW 42.18.260.]